Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5675.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 34-18 of the General Laws entitled "Residential Landlord and Tenant
Act" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
34-18-62. Inquiries regarding immigration status.
(a) No landlord or any agent of the landlord shall:
(1) Make any inquiry regarding or based on the immigration or citizenship status of a
tenant, prospective tenant, occupant, or prospective occupant of residential rental property; or
(2) Require that any tenant, prospective tenant, occupant, or prospective occupant of the
rental property make any statement, representation, or certification concerning their immigration
or citizenship status.
(b) No municipality or housing agency shall compel a landlord or any agent of the landlord
to make any inquiry, compile, disclose, report, or provide any information, prohibit offering or
continuing to offer accommodations in the property for rent or lease, or otherwise take any action
regarding or based on the immigration or citizenship status of a tenant, prospective tenant, occupant
or prospective occupant of residential rental property.
(c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a landlord from:
(1) Complying with any legal obligation under federal law; or
(2) In accordance with applicable law, requesting any information or any documentation
that may be necessary to determine or verify the financial qualifications of a prospective tenant.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000720
========
LC000720 - Page 2 of 3